Hawaii statutes.
§206J-14 Bonds exempt from taxation.
Bonds and the income therefrom issued pursuant to this chapter shall be exempt
from all state and county taxation except estate and transfer taxes. [L 1981, c
236, pt of §1; am L 1986, c 146, §11]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next